North Dakota, session 69, SB2346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 4.1-03-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
4.1-03-02. North Dakota beef commission - Membership - Qualifications.
1. The North Dakota beef commission consists of:
a. Three beef producers;
b. One cattle feeder;
c. One dairy producer;
d. One representative of a public livestock market; and
e. Three at-large representatives.
2. The governor shall appoint:
a. Each beef producer from a list of at least two names submitted by the North
Dakota stockmen's association;
b. The cattle feeder from a list of at least two names submitted by the North Dakota
stockmen's association feeder council;
c. The dairy producer from a list of at least two names submitted by the milk
producers association of North Dakota;
d. The representative of a public livestock market from a list of at least two names
submitted by the North Dakota livestock marketing association; and
e. The three at-large representatives.
Page No. 1 25.1220.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
3. Each individual seeking membership as an a t - large representative shall complete and
submit an application in accordance with section 2 of this Act. In a year in which an
a t - large representative term is scheduled to expire, the application period opens on
March first and closes on May first.
4. a. Each member of the commission must:
(1) Be a United States citizen and a resident of this state;
(2) Be actively engaged in that phase of the cattle industry the member
represents; and
(3) Have been actively engaged in that phase of the cattle industry for a period
of five years.
b. Each member of the commission, except the representative of a public livestock
market, must be a participating producer.
c. For purposes of this subsection, "actively engaged" means that the individual:
(1) Has an ownership interest in an operation that is of sufficient scope and
significance as to constitute a distinct activity; and
(2) Has and regularly exercises direct control of the operation.
SECTION 2. A new section to chapter 4.1-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
At - large representatives - Expiring terms - Notice .
1. When the term of an a t - large representative is scheduled to expire, the commission
shall publish a notification, beginning in March of that year, once per month for two
consecutive months in the official newspaper of each county. The notification must
include:
a. A statement indicating applications are being accepted for an a t - large
representative member on the commission;
b. Instructions for obtaining an application form;
c. The deadline to submit an application;
d. Submission instructions for a completed application; and
e. The length of the term of office.
2. Beginning on March first, the commission shall post on the commission's website a
notification that includes the information provided in subsection 1 in a year when the
Page No. 2 25.1220.01000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
term of an a t - large representative is scheduled to expire. The notification must remain
posted until the application period closes.
Page No. 3 25.1220.01000